lt-LT: Plunksnų šaltinis: Ančių; Žąsų; Mišrios; Kita
pl: Źródło piór: Kaczka; Gęś; Mieszane; Inne
vi: Nguồn lông vũ: Vịt; Ngỗng; Hỗn hợp; Khác
da: Fjerkilde: And; Gås; Blandet; Andet
ja: 羽毛の出所: アヒル; ガチョウ; ミックス; その他
hr-HR: Izvor perja: Patka; Guska; Miješano; Ostalo
ko: 깃털 원산 동물: 오리; 거위; 혼합; 기타
ru: Источник перьев: Утка; Гусь; Смешанный; Другое
de: Mengeneinheit der Federn: Ente; Gans; Gemischt; Sonstige
es: Fuente de plumas: Pato; Ganso; Mixto; Otra
zh-CN: 羽毛来源: 鸭; 鹅; 混合; 其他
ro-RO: Sursă de pene: Rață; Gâscă; Mixt; Altele
cs: Zdroj peří: Kachna; Husa; Smíšené; Jiné
tr: Tüy kaynağı: Ördek; Kaz; Karışık; Diğer
pt-BR: Origem da pena: Pato; Ganso; Mista; Outra
nl: Veer bron: Eend; Gans; Gemengd; Overig
bg-BG: Произход на перата: Патица; Гъска; Смесени; Друго
fr: Origine des plumes: Canard; Oie; Mixte; Autre
it: Fonte delle piume: Anatra; Oca; Mista; Altra
th: แหล่งที่มาของขนนก: เป็ด; ห่าน; ผสม; อื่นๆ
hu: Toll forrása: Kacsa; Liba; Vegyes; Egyéb
fi: Höyhenten alkuperä: Ankka; Hanhi; Sekoitus; Muu
el: Πηγή φτερών: Πάπια; Χήνα; Ανάμεικτα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vir perja: Raca; Gos; Mešano; Drugo
zh-TW: 羽毛來源: 鴨; 鵝; 混合; 其他
nb: Fjærkilde: And; Gås; Blandet; Annet
sk-SK: Zdroj peria: Kačica; Hus; Zmiešané; Iný
pt-PT: Fonte de penas: Pato; Ganso; Misto; Outro
en: Feather source: Duck; Goose; Mixed; Other
sv: Ursprung för fjäder: Anka; Gås; Blandad; Övrigt